Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2446.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7385.3. Fire Company Transformational Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Fire Company Transformational Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the office.(b) Funding.--The office may expend not more than $30,000,000 annually from the Property Tax Relief Reserve Fund for the purposes of awarding grants under this section.(c) Eligible applicants.--A municipal fire company, volunteer fire company and combination fire company may be eligible for a grant under the program upon application to the 12345678910111213141516 office in the form and manner prescribed by the office.(d) Purposes.--Grants under the program shall be used to:(1) Purchase equipment, including vehicles, protective equipment, communications equipment and accessory equipment.(2) Renovate, modernize or construct facilities necessary for the operation of a fire company.(3) Fund retention and recruitment programs, including stipends, length of service award programs, recruitment campaigns and necessary consultants.(4) Pay staffing costs, including salaries for active firefighting personnel, not to include any overtime costs.(5) Pay for expenses related to multicompany projects or regionalization efforts.(6) Fund projects that improve operations and service delivery involving multiple fire companies.(7) Fund any other uses deemed appropriate by the office in the guideline published under subsection (f)(1).(e) Eligibility.--To receive a grant under the program, an applicant must:(1) Be actively participating in a fire reporting system as designated by the office.(2) Have on record with the commissioner up-to-date point-of-contact information for the municipal fire company, volunteer fire company or combination fire company. The contact information shall include a mailing address, a telephone number and an email address and must be submitted to the commissioner no later than July 31 immediately preceding each grant application period.(3) Be registered as an active response agency with a public safety answering point as defined in section 5302 20260HB2446PN3479 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to definitions).(4) Have a fire company identification number that is associated solely with the fire company applying for the grant.(5) Be designated by a municipality, by resolution or ordinance, as a provider of fire or rescue services within the municipality.(6) Not be delinquent or in violation of any other grant or loan issued by the office.(f) Program standards and requirements.--(1) The office shall issue guidelines to implement the program and shall transmit the guidelines to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) Program guidelines shall:(i) Establish eligibility standards for applicants.(ii) Describe the objectives of the program, which objectives shall be consistent with this section.(iii) Establish caps, limits and restrictions with respect to grant amounts in accordance with subsection (g).(iv) Establish an annual application process and timelines for submission of applications.(v) Present the criteria under which grant applications shall be evaluated by the office.(vi) Establish a timetable within which the office shall award or disapprove a complete grant application.(vii) Establish procedures by which the office shall verify expenditures of grant money by a grant recipient.(viii) Establish requirements related to 20260HB2446PN3479 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recordkeeping and audit procedure.(g) Amounts and criteria.--Grants issued under the program shall be:(1) No less than $100,000 and no more than $1,000,000, unless the applicant for the grant is composed of two or more municipal fire companies, combination fire companies or volunteer fire companies that consolidated their equipment, firefighters and services within five years preceding the date of the current year's application submission deadline, in which case the grant shall be no more than $2,500,000.(2) For a period of five years or less, unless the office determines that there is a hardship or undue burden to extend the term of the grant in excess of five years. The commissioner shall have sole discretion to determine whether a fire company has demonstrated hardship or undue burden. No extension may result in a term that exceeds 10 years from the effective date of the award.(3) Issued on a reimbursement basis, except when payment is necessary to procure items and services that require advanced payment or working capital. The grant recipient shall be required to provide documentation that supports an advanced payment request with their application.(h) Restrictions.--The office may not award a grant to an eligible applicant that submits an untimely application.(i) Administration.--The office may use up to 2% of the funds available under this section for administrative costs.(j) Annual reports.--(1) The commissioner shall prepare an annual report on the grants administered under the program. The report shall include all of the following information:20260HB2446PN3479 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The total number of applications received for grants.(ii) The total number of applications approved and the amounts funded for each recipient.(iii) An analysis of how the grants were used by each recipient.(2) The commissioner shall submit the annual report under paragraph (1) to all of the following:(I) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE.(II) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(i) (III) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate.(ii) (IV) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The commissioner shall post the annual report under paragraph (1) on the office's publicly accessible Internet website.(k) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Combination fire company." A volunteer fire company located in this Commonwealth with at least two paid employees in addition to a fire chief. The term includes either an independent, nonprofit entity or part of a unit of local government."Municipal fire company." A firefighting service that is 20260HB2446PN3479 - 5 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 established and operated by a municipality in this Commonwealth as a part of the unit of local government. The term does not include a nonprofit chartered corporation, independent association or independent organization."Office." The Office of the State Fire Commissioner."Program." The Fire Company Transformational Grant Program established under this section."Volunteer fire company." As defined in section 7802 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2446PN3479 - 6 - 12345678910